src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot !!≈ @CODE@
pieni:pien a5_pieni ;  
auki:auk2 a5_auki ;
ilta-auki:ilta-auk2 a5_auki ;
tosi:to a5_uusi ;
uusi:uu a5_uusi ;
täysi:täy a5_uusi ;
inttelikentti:inttelikentti a5_odd ;
krovi:krovi a5_even ;
vakanen:vaka anen_even ;
molkkanen:molkka anen_even ;
kahenkymmenjalkanen:kahenkymmen#jalka anen_even ;
nuskanen:nuska anen_even ;
ylivoimanen:yli#voima anen_even ;
keltapunanen:keltapuna anen_even ;
lujakouranen:luja#koura anen_even ;
meänkaltanen:meänkalta anen_even ;
jyrkkärantanen:jyrkkäranta anen_even ;
poutanen:pouta anen_even ;
kielelinen:kieleli anen_odd ;
vastakhainen:vastakhai anen_even ;
salhainen:salhai anen_even ;
pitukainen:pitukai anen_odd ;
länsilestaatialainen:länsilestaatialai anen_odd ;
saksalainen:saksalai anen_odd ;
norrlantilainen:norrlantilai anen_odd ;
pienenlainen:pienenlai anen_odd ;
hyvänlainen:hyvänlai anen_odd ;
turhamainen:turhamai anen_odd ;
ulkomainen:ulkomai anen_odd ;
etukumarainen:etu#kumarai anen_odd ;
laiskanpuolheinen:laiskanpuolhei anen_even ;
pumpulikutheinen:pumpuli#kuthei anen_even ;
strateekinen:strateeki anen_odd ;
liekkinen:liekki anen_even ;
lookinen:looki anen_even ;
sentimentaalinen:sentimentaali anen_odd ;
lialinen:liali anen_odd ;
pilkalinen:pilkali anen_odd ;
piinalinen:piinali anen_odd ;
viralinen:virali anen_odd ;
ivalinen:ivali anen_odd ;
psykedelinen:psykedeli anen_even ;
tietheelinen:tietheeli anen_odd ;
hengelinen:hengeli anen_odd ;
hajamielinen:hajamieli anen_even ;
toelinen:toeli anen_odd ;
vallankumoukselinen:vallankumoukseli anen_even ;
äkilinen:äkili anen_odd ;
erilinen:erili anen_odd ;
havilinen:havili anen_odd ;
uskonolinen:uskonoli anen_odd ;
aurinkonpuolinen:aurinkonpuoli anen_even ;
kelvolinen:kelvoli anen_odd ;
pripulinen:pripuli anen_odd ;
myrkylinen:myrkyli anen_odd ;
ystävälinen:ystäväli anen_even ;
ekonoominen:ekonoomi anen_odd ;
jääsininen:jääsini anen_even ;
raukkamoinen:raukkamoi anen_odd ;
vääräoppinen:väärä#oppi anen_even ;
pahankurinen:pahan#kuri anen_even ;
lusikanlehtinen:lusikan#lehti anen_even ;
plastinen:plasti anen_even ;
fantastinen:fantasti anen_odd ;
hyvänsorttinen:hyvän#sortti anen_even ;
löyhäsuinen:löyhäsui anen_odd ;
lovinen:lovi anen_even ;
lyhykäinen:lyhykäi anen_odd ;
yksinäinen:yksinäi anen_odd ;
tyytyväinen:tyytyväi anen_odd ;
hyäkuulonen:hyä#kuulo anen_even ;
huonokuntonen:huono#kunto anen_even ;
kuhmunen:kuhmu anen_even ;
nykynen:nyky anen_even ;
pienisilmänen:pieni#silmä anen_even ;
suurennäkönen:suuren#näkö anen_even ;
irtain:irtai a_ime ;
paikoin:paikoi a_ime ;
avoin:avoi a_ime ;
paikon:paiko a_ime ;
naimaton:naimat a_ton ;
kanneton:kannet a_ton ;
langaton:langat a_ton ;
lahjaton:lahjat a_ton ;
jalaton:jalat a_ton ;
kaulaton:kaulat a_ton ;
hollaamaton:hollaamat a_ton ;
kehtaamaton:kehtaamat a_ton ;
tervaamaton:tervaamat a_ton ;
taitamaton:taitamat a_ton ;
kannattamaton:kannattamat a_ton ;
oottamaton:oottamat a_ton ;
koskematon:koskemat a_ton ;
olematon:olemat a_ton ;
huolimaton:huolimat a_ton ;
vaatimaton:vaatimat a_ton ;
latomaton:latomat a_ton ;
luopumaton:luopumat a_ton ;
sanaton:sanat a_ton ;
tasaton:tasat a_ton ;
murheeton:murheet a_ton ;
onneton:onnet a_ton ;
vuoriton:vuorit a_ton ;
iloton:ilot a_ton ;
toivoton:toivot a_ton ;
alaston:alas a_ston ;
tajuton:tajut a_ton ;
avon:avo a_ime ;
miehetön:miehet a_ton ;
pilvetön:pilvet a_ton ;
järjetön:järjet a_ton ;
kykenemätön:kykenemät a_ton ;
sivistymätön:sivistymät a_ton ;
väistämätön:väistämät a_ton ;
pölkäämätön:pölkäämät a_ton ;
pölötön:pölöt a_ton ;
puhas:puhta a_has ;
hias:hita a_ias ;
puhelias:puhelia a_ias ;
laulelias:laulelia aas ;
kohtelias:kohtelia aas ;
utelias:utelia aas ;
laupias:laupia aas ;
kaheksantoistavuotias:kaheksantoistavuotia aas ;
paljas:palja aas ;
mahakas:mahakka aas ;
lahjakas:lahjakka aas ;
lamakas:lamakka aas ;
virmakas:virmakka aas ;
viinarakas:viinarakka aas ;
raivokas:raivokka aas ;
viekas:viekka aas ;
raikas:raikka aas ;
naalikas:naalikka aas ;
praamikas:praamikka aas ;
juonikas:juonikka aas ;
unikas:unikka aas ;
voimarikas:voimarikka aas ;
upporikas:upporikka aas ;
kousikas:kousikka aas ;
konstikas:konstikka aas ;
tehokas:tehokka aas ;
tarmokas:tarmokka aas ;
tunnokas:tunnokka aas ;
nerokas:nerokka aas ;
kirkas:kirkka aas ;
raskas:raska aas ;
liukas:liukka aas ;
joutilas:joutila aas ;
iltavalpas:iltavalppa aas ;
mielisairas:mielisaira aas ;
viisas:viisa aas ;
karsas:karsa aas ;
karvas:karva aas ;
